Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.130.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Transportation fee" means the fee charged to employees and students at institutions of higher education for the purposes provided in RCW 28B.130.020.

(2) "Transportation demand management program" means the set of strategies adopted by an institution of higher education to reduce the number of single-occupant vehicles traveling to its campus. These strategies may include but are not limited to those identified in RCW 70A.15.4040.

[ 2021 c 65 s 22; 1993 c 447 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.